Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5646.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 1531l. (1) Beginning September 30, 2027, the superintendent of public instruction shall issue a teaching certificate or applicable endorsement under section 1531 only to an individual who has completed a teacher preparation program that does both of the following: (a) Requires completion of the content described in subsection (2) by all individuals who instruct courses or programs in literacy or reading methods in the teacher preparation program. (b) Requires comprehensive knowledge of the science of reading by all individuals who instruct courses or programs in literacy or reading methods in the teacher preparation program. (2) By not later than September 30, 2027, an institution of higher education or an alternative teaching program as described in section 1531i that operates a teacher preparation program shall ensure that the teacher preparation program meets both of the following content requirements: (a) Teacher content knowledge and pedagogical knowledge of the critical components of literacy, including how the brain learns to read, phonological and phonemic awareness, letter knowledge, phonics, advanced phonics, vocabulary and oral language, fluency, comprehension, spelling and writing, and the organization of language as appropriate for the grade level and content area in which a teacher candidate seeks certification and endorsement. (b) Understanding how to effectively use screening, progress monitoring, and diagnostic assessment data to improve literacy outcomes through prevention and intervention for reading difficulties in a multi-tiered system of supports, as appropriate for the grade level and content area in which a teacher candidate seeks certification and endorsement. The multi-tiered system of supports must include at least all of the following essential components: (i) Team-based leadership. (ii) A tiered delivery system. (iii) Selection and implementation of instruction, interventions, and supports. (iv) A comprehensive screening and assessment system. (v) Continuous data-based decision making. (3) A teacher candidate may satisfy the requirements of this section by completing the professional learning selected by the department under section 35a(11) of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1635a. (4) A teacher candidate who completes the requirements of this section satisfies the reading credit requirement under section 1531(3) for progression to professional certification. (5) As used in this section: (a) âMulti-tiered system of supportsâ means that term as defined in section 1280f. (b) âScience of readingâ means that term as defined in section 1280f. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor